Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.335.205

Assistive devices—Transfer for benefit of children with disabilities—Record, inventory.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the office of the superintendent of public instruction, the Washington state school for the blind, the Washington center for deaf and hard of hearing youth, school districts, educational service districts, and all other state or local governmental agencies concerned with education may loan, lease, sell, or transfer assistive devices for the use and benefit of children with disabilities to children with disabilities or their parents or to any other public or private nonprofit agency providing services to or on behalf of individuals with disabilities including but not limited to any agency providing educational, health, or rehabilitation services. The notice requirement in RCW 28A.335.180 does not apply to the loan, lease, sale, or transfer of such assistive devices. The sale or transfer of such devices is authorized under this section regardless of whether or not the devices have been declared surplus. The sale or transfer shall be recorded in an agreement between the parties and based upon the item's depreciated value.

For the purposes of this section, "assistive device" means any item, piece of equipment, or product system, whether acquired commercially off-the-shelf, modified, or customized, that is used to increase, maintain, or improve functional capabilities of children with disabilities.

For the purpose of implementing this section, each educational agency shall establish and maintain an inventory of assistive technology devices in its possession that exceed one hundred dollars and, for each such device, shall establish a value, which shall be adjusted annually to reflect depreciation.

This section shall not enhance or diminish the obligation of school districts to provide assistive technology to children with disabilities where needed to achieve a free and appropriate public education and equal opportunity in accessing academic and extracurricular activities.

[ 2019 c 266 s 18; 2009 c 381 s 28; 1997 c 104 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 381: See note following RCW 72.40.015.